Louisiana, session 2026, HB570.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1705(B)(1)(a) and (b)(i) and (2)(b) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1705. Information supplied to assessor and legislative auditor by tax recipient
agencies; additional notices
* * *
B.(1)(a)(i) Beginning in the 2027 ad valorem tax year, for For any taxing
authority with a governing authority membership which that is elected by the voters,
increases in the millage rate in excess of the rates established as provided by Article
VII, Section 23(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, but not in excess of the prior
year's maximum authorized millage rate the maximum authorized millage rate
approved by the Constitution of Louisiana and approved by the taxing authority until
the authorized millage rate expires, may be levied by two-thirds vote of the total
membership of a taxing authority without further voter approval but only after a
public hearing held in accordance with the open meetings law. Maximum millage
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 570 ENROLLED
rates not levied prior to the 2024 reassessment year, or the 2023 reassessment year
for Orleans Parish, shall be permanently reduced to the adjusted maximum millage
rate established for the 2026 ad valorem tax year or the 2025 ad valorem tax year in
Orleans Parish.
(ii) If an immediate subsequent reassessment has an increased taxable value,
the adjusted maximum millage rate shall be decreased to the maximum millage rate
for the 2024 reassessment year, or the 2023 reassessment year for Orleans Parish,
provided by the Constitution of Louisiana and approved by the taxing authority.
(b)(i)(aa) Beginning in the 2027 ad valorem tax year, any Any taxing
authority with a governing authority membership which that is not elected by the
voters may increase a millage rate in excess of the rates established as provided in
Article VII, Section 23(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, but not in excess of the
prior year's maximum authorized millage rate approved by the Constitution of
Louisiana and approved by the taxing authority until the authorized millage rate
expires. Such increased millage shall also be limited to an amount which would
increase the ad valorem taxes collected by the taxing authority by no more than two
and one-half percent of the collections for the calendar year immediately preceding
the year for which the increased millage rate is effective. Maximum millage rates not
levied by a taxing authority prior to the 2024 reassessment year, or the 2023
reassessment year for Orleans Parish, shall be permanently reduced to the adjusted
maximum millage rate established for the 2026 ad valorem tax year or the 2025 ad
valorem tax year in Orleans Parish.
(bb) If an immediate subsequent reassessment has an increased taxable value,
the adjusted maximum millage rate shall be decreased to the maximum millage rate
for the 2024 reassessment year, or the 2023 reassessment year for Orleans Parish,
provided by the Constitution of Louisiana and approved by the taxing authority.
* * *
(2) In order to accomplish this result, the following shall be mandatory:
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 570 ENROLLED
(b) Before a tax recipient body levies and collects an increased millage rate,
each Each tax recipient body shall adopt a separate ordinance or resolution which
shall provide for such millage rate increases by two-thirds vote and shall set forth
and designate not only the increased millage rate but also the adjusted millage rate
as required in Subparagraph (a) above and by Article VII, Section 23(B) of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall apply to all taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2027.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, but only if the
proposed amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 521 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.